Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1418
Advertising or promotional materials; restriction.

Any advertising or promotional materials relating to the Nebraska educational savings plan trust may include references to a public office but shall not refer to an officeholder by name.

Laws 2000, LB 1003, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 85-1805;

Laws 2025, LB647, § 43.